Washington statutes.
RCW 39.89.080

General indebtedness—Security.

(1) A local government designating an increment area and authorizing the use of community revitalization financing may incur general indebtedness, and issue general obligation bonds, to finance the public improvements and retire the indebtedness in whole or in part from tax allocation revenues it receives, subject to the following requirements:

(a) The ordinance adopted by the local government creating the increment area and authorizing the use of community revitalization financing indicates an intent to incur this indebtedness and the maximum amount of this indebtedness that is contemplated; and

(b) The local government includes this statement of the intent in all notices required by RCW 39.89.050.

(2) The general indebtedness incurred under subsection (1) of this section may be payable from other tax revenues, the full faith and credit of the local government, and nontax income, revenues, fees, and rents from the public improvements, as well as contributions, grants, and nontax money available to the local government for payment of costs of the public improvements or associated debt service on the general indebtedness.

(3) In addition to the requirements in subsection (1) of this section, a local government designating an increment area and authorizing the use of community revitalization financing may require the nonpublic participant to provide adequate security to protect the public investment in the public improvement within the increment area.

[ 2001 c 212 s 8.]